Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6102
Registered interior designer; regulation; registration; required, when.

In order to safeguard life, health, and property, to promote the public welfare, and to recognize the need for design professionals to obtain government-issued permits or approval that may only be obtained with a construction document stamp, the profession of interior design is declared to be subject to regulation in the public interest. On and after January 1, 2025, it shall be unlawful for any person to hold oneself out to be a registered interior designer unless the person is registered under the Interior Design Voluntary Registration Act.

Laws 2024, LB16, § 15.